Oklahoma, session 2025, SB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.53, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 34.53. A. 1. The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education, established by Article XIII-A of the Oklahoma


Constitution, shall operate an allotment system similar to the


procedure set out in the Oklahoma State Finance Act for other


agencies of the state except that the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education shall be substituted for the Director of the Office


of Management and Enterprise Services in connection with approving



Req. No. 325 Page 1


allotment requests of the constituent institutions comprising The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.


2. The account classification for the State System of Higher


Education shall conform as nearly as possible with the


classification of accounts recommended by the National Committee on


Standard Reports for Institutions of Higher Education.


3. The Board of Regents shall allocate to each institution


under its control from the consolidated, or lump sum appropriation


made by the Legislature, an amount sufficient to meet the needs and


functions of each institution for the entire year.


4. The amount allocated to each institution for each fiscal


year in accordance with Article XIII-A of the Oklahoma Constitution,


shall be made in a lump sum without regard to uniform budget or


accounting classifications, but shall not be available for


expenditure until subsequently allotted by the Regents in accordance


with the uniform budget and accounting classifications recommended


by the National Committee on Standard Reports.


B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may reduce


the allocation of funds which could otherwise be made to an


institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education in


order to make payments for leases within the lease financing program


authorized by Section 3206.5 3206.6a of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.



Req. No. 325 Page 2


C. 1. The Regents, with the approval of the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services, may allot money to any


constituent institution to set up and operate a petty cash fund at


said such institution. Such petty cash fund shall be reimbursed


upon the filing of claims showing the purposes for which the funds


were expended.


2. The Division of Central Accounting and Reporting shall make


cash allocations of revenue in accordance with Section 23 of Article


X of the Oklahoma Constitution, to each of the constituent


institutions. These cash allocations shall be based on the


allocations made by the Regents to each institution from the lump


sum legislative appropriations and such allocation shall be the


total appropriation for each institution, in lieu of legislative


appropriations.


3. After these funds have been allocated and allotted as


provided in this section, all institutional income shall operate as


a continuing nonfiscal appropriation which may be spent for any


educational and general purposes for which appropriated funds may be


spent. “Institutional income” for such purposes shall mean all


income available for educational and general purposes, as defined in


the uniform budget and accounting classifications recommended by the


National Committee on Standard Reports, and including income defined


by law as revolving fund income. Expenditures shall be limited to


the extent that obligations as they are incurred may not exceed the

Req. No. 325 Page 3


unencumbered balance of cash on hand in accordance with Section 23


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


D. 1. At least thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of each


fiscal year, each of the constituent institutions shall file with


the Regents its request for appropriation allotments for each of the


purposes for which expenditures are to be made.


2. Such requests shall be broken down to conform to the uniform


budget or accounting classifications recommended by the National


Committee on Standard Reports.


3. Each institution’s request for appropriation allotments


shall show the amount required to finance each item of the request


for the entire year and for each quarter or each six-months six-


month period within the fiscal year, as required by the Director of


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


E. The Regents, or the official or employee who has been


authorized to approve itemized allotment requests, shall consider


the allotment requests for the purpose of making a determination


whether:


1. The current financial requirements of the institution


concerned justify the allotment to be made;


2. The accounting classification is sufficient to reflect the


purpose for which expenditures are to be made and that such


classification is in accordance with the budget classifications


adopted by the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise

Req. No. 325 Page 4


Services and the Regents, which shall conform as nearly as possible


to the account classification recommended by the National Committee


on Standard Reports for Institutions of Higher Education; and


3. The realization of estimated revenues determined by the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services is


sufficient to allow the commitments to be made.


F. 1. In allotting appropriations and other funds, and


approving subsequent allotments which may be required by each


institution, the Regents shall follow the same general procedure set


forth in the Oklahoma State Finance Act for other agencies of the


state not under the control of said the Regents, except as otherwise


provided in this section.


2. All forms and account classifications shall be mutually


agreed upon by the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services and the State Regents.


3. The Regents shall file approved requests of constituent


institutions with the Division of Central Accounting and Reporting


and such requests shall be entered on the records of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services in the same manner as is provided


in the Oklahoma State Finance Act for other agencies of the state.


4. The State Regents and the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services shall approve any request from


the administrative head of a constituent institution for amendment


of the approved schedule of positions and salaries, or transfers

Req. No. 325 Page 5


between items, so long as the currently approved allotment for such


purposes is not exceeded. Each such amendment shall be filed with


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, in such detail as


may be required, prior to the date on which the first payroll or


other disbursement affected by such amendment or transfer is


submitted for payment.


G. 1. In the event that the realization of estimated revenues


at any time during the fiscal year indicates that the total revenue


for that fiscal year to any state fund will be insufficient at the


end of the fiscal year to meet the total appropriations from that


fund, the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall notify the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education as to the amount of reduction necessary against the


consolidated, or lump sum appropriations, made to the Regents.


2. The Regents, in making itemized allotments during the fiscal


year, may reserve an amount sufficient to meet a reasonable failure


of revenue until receipt of notice from the Director of the Office


of Management and Enterprise Services that the realization of


estimated revenues indicates that the total appropriation may be


allotted for expenditure. Upon receipt of notice from the Director


of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services of a necessary


reduction in the consolidated, or lump sum appropriation, to meet a


failure in revenue, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education


shall immediately take action to control the approval of subsequent

Req. No. 325 Page 6


allotment requests sufficient to make the aggregate reduction in


allotments of all constituent institutions under their control equal


the amount of reduction ordered against the lump sum appropriation


made by the Legislature. Such reductions against the lump sum


appropriation shall not exceed the percentage reduction ordered


against other agencies of the state in accordance with Section 23,


of Article 10, X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3206.6a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3206.6a. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education may finance acquisition of or improvements to, or


refinance or restructure outstanding obligations for real property


pursuant to the master lease program. The funds used by the Regents


for the purposes authorized by this section shall be available for


lease transactions having a term that is no more than the useful


life of any real property or improvements acquired by institutions


pursuant to the provisions of this section, and in no event, more


than thirty (30) years.


B. After May 24, 2005, any bonds issued pursuant to this


section shall be subject to the approval of the Legislature as


provided by this subsection. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education shall submit an itemized list of the proposed projects and


the terms of the financing to the Governor, the Speaker of the House


of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the State Senate

Req. No. 325 Page 7


and all members of the Legislature within the first seven (7)


legislative days of an annual legislative session and prior to the


time any such obligations are sold. The submission to such elected


officials shall occur upon the same date for purposes of computing


the time within which action must be taken as further prescribed by


this subsection. The Legislature shall have a period of forty-five


(45) calendar days from the date on which the information is


submitted to pass a concurrent resolution disapproving all or part


of the proposed issuance. If the Legislature does not disapprove


the proposed issuance by concurrent resolution by the end of the


forty-fifth day following the date upon which the proposed issuance


is submitted, the proposed issuance shall be deemed to have been


approved by the Legislature.


C. The amount of transactions financed in a calendar year


through the real property master lease program authorized by this


section shall not exceed the combined total of:


1. The submission described in subsection B of this section, or


portion thereof, approved by the Legislature;


2. Any issuance for additional proposed individual projects


submitted by institutions under the coordination of the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education and approved by the Legislature;


and





Req. No. 325 Page 8


3. Any projects approved by the Legislature in a prior calendar


year for which no financing action was taken in the prior calendar


year; and


4. Any projects refunded from a previous issuance.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-325 QD 12/30/2024 11:02:14 PM



































Req. No. 325 Page 9